California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12997.

In lieu of seeking prosecution of any violation of this division as a misdemeanor, and the penalty prescribed in Section 12996, the director may prosecute civilly pursuant to Sections 12998 and 12999, or may levy civil penalties pursuant to Section 12999.4 or the commissioner may levy civil penalties pursuant to Section 12999.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12997.5.

(a) In addition to any penalties paid in connection with an enforcement action taken pursuant to Sections 12996, 12997, 12999, and 12999.5, any person who is found in violation of any provision of this division related to pesticides or any regulation related to pesticides adopted pursuant to this division that results in illness or injury requiring emergency medical transport or immediate medical treatment of any individual in a nonoccupational setting from any pesticide used in the production of an agricultural commodity, shall be liable to the individual harmed or to the medical provider for the immediate costs of uncompensated medical care from acute injuries and illnesses of the exposed individual.

(b) Any order issued in connection with a finding of a violation as described in subdivision (a) shall include the obligation to reimburse medical costs from acute illnesses and injuries of any individual requiring immediate medical treatment as a consequence of this violation to the injured individuals or their medical providers.

(c) Any person found in violation of this section shall submit to the director within 30 days of the final determination of liability, a written plan on how they will pay individuals and medical providers for the emergency medical transport and the immediate medical costs from acute medical injuries and illnesses of all individuals requiring immediate medical treatment as a consequence of the violation. A person alleged to have violated subdivision (a) may voluntarily submit a written plan pursuant to this section prior to the determination of liability. The contents of the voluntary plan shall not be held against the person in any action to determine whether the person violated those provisions.

(d) Any violation of this section shall be subject to the criminal and civil sanctions and penalties set forth in this division.

(e) Payment of emergency medical costs pursuant to this section shall not preclude an affected person from filing a civil action for injuries, illnesses, or costs related to the incident. Any damage award associated with a civil action related to the incident shall be reduced by the amount the plaintiff received from this section.

(f) Payment of emergency medical costs pursuant to this section shall not be held against the person in any action to determine whether the person violated those provisions.

(g) For any person who provides for the immediate reimbursement of medical costs for acute medical illnesses and injuries prior to a final determination by the department, the director or agricultural commissioner may reduce, by not more than 50 percent, the fines imposed pursuant to Section 12996.5. This reduction shall not limit the responsible party’s financial obligation under this section. The department or agricultural commissioner shall attempt to complete the determination within 45 days of the incident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 913, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12997.7.

(a) The agency, in consultation with the department, the office, county agricultural commissioners, local health officers, CUPAs, and affected community members, shall by August 31, 2005, establish minimum standard protocols for the purposes of amending area plans.

(b) The protocols shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Protocols for requesting and providing immediate access to pesticide-specific information necessary to assist emergency medical services personnel in identifying pesticides that may be causing a pesticide drift exposure incident and appropriate treatments.

(2) Protocols to delineate specific agency responsibilities and the process for responding to calls, notifying residents, and coordinating evacuation, if needed.

(3) Protocols to establish emergency shelter procedures and locations to be used in the event evacuation is needed.

(4) Protocols to access services in all languages known to be spoken in the affected area in accordance with Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(5) Protocols to ensure access to health care within 24 hours of the exposure and up to a week after the exposure.

(6) Protocols to notify medical providers regarding eligibility for reimbursement pursuant to Section 12997.5.

(c) The CUPA or administering agency shall amend the area plan for emergency response, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25503, to specifically address pesticide drift exposure and to incorporate provisions of the protocols of subdivision (b).

(d) Upon the next scheduled update of the area plan, all CUPAs shall have incorporated a pesticide drift component into their area plan.

(e) The minimum standard protocols developed under subdivision (a) shall be in accordance with the California Environmental Protection Agency’s guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 913, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12997.8.

(a) (1) A person who sells or uses a first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide in violation of Section 12978.7 or any regulations adopted pursuant to that section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day for each violation, in addition to any other penalty established by law.

(2) In an action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may enjoin the unlawful sale or use of a first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide, and may compel specific performance of an act or course of conduct necessary to protect a person, animal, crop, or property.

(b) (1) Civil penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund, and shall be available for expenditure to cover the department’s costs in administering and enforcing this section and Section 12978.7.

(2) Any remaining civil penalties, after covering the costs described in paragraph (1), shall be available for expenditure for the purposes described in Section 6027.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 571, Sec. 3.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12998.

Any person who violates this division relating to pesticides or structural pest control devices, or any regulation issued pursuant to a provision of this division relating to pesticides or structural pest control devices, is liable civilly in an amount not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each violation. Any
 person who commits a second or subsequent violation that is the same as a prior violation or similar to a prior violation or whose intentional violation resulted or reasonably could have resulted in the creation of a hazard to human health or the environment or in the disruption of the market of the crop or commodity involved, is liable civilly in an amount not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) nor more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for each violation. Any money recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Pesticide
 Regulation Fund for use by the department in administering this division, and Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 5.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12999.

Upon a complaint by the director, or by the Structural Pest Control Board in the case of violations of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15300) or regulations adopted pursuant to that chapter relating to structural pest control devices, the Attorney General may bring an action for civil penalties in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this division, or any regulation issued pursuant to it. The Attorney General may bring an action for civil penalties on his or her own initiative if, after examining the complaint and the evidence, he or she believes a violation has occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12999.2.

The remedies or penalties provided by this division are in addition to the remedies or penalties available under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12999.4.

(a) In lieu of civil prosecution by the director, the director may levy a civil penalty against a person violating subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 11792, Sections 12101, 12101.5, 12114, 12115, 12116, 12581, 12603, 12671, 12992, and 12993, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 12400) of Division 6, Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 12841), Section 13186.5, Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15300), or the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, and Sections 6560, 6562, 6564, 6568, 6574, 6576, and 6577 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation.

(b) Before a civil penalty is levied, the
 person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action,
 including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and shall have the right to request a hearing within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. Before the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the director’s evidence. At the hearing, the person shall be given the opportunity to present evidence on their own behalf. If a hearing is not timely requested, the director may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(c) If the person against whom the director levied a civil penalty requested and appeared at a hearing, the person may seek review of the director’s decision within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) After the exhaustion of the review procedure provided in this section, the director, or the director’s representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the director that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. Pursuant to Section 6103 of the Government Code, the clerk of the superior court shall not charge a fee for the performance
 of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(e) Any money recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund for use by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, in administering this division and Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 22.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12999.5.

(a) In lieu of civil prosecution by the director, the county agricultural commissioner may levy a civil penalty against a person violating Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401), Article 10 (commencing with Section 12971) or Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 12980) of this chapter, Section 12995, Article 1 (commencing with Section 14001) of Chapter 3, Chapter 3.7 (commencing with Section 14160), Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15300), Section 29102, or a regulation adopted pursuant to any of these provisions, of not more
 than three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each violation. Any violation determined by the county agricultural commissioner to be a Class A violation as defined in Section 6130 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations is subject to a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation. It is unlawful and grounds for denial of a permit under Section 14008 for a person to refuse or neglect to pay a civil penalty levied pursuant to this section once the order is final.

(b) If a person has received a civil penalty for pesticide drift in a school area subject to Section 11503.5 that results in a Class A violation as defined in subdivision (a), the county agricultural commissioner shall charge a fee, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), for processing and monitoring each subsequent pesticide application
 that may pose a risk of pesticide drift made in a school area subject to Section 11503.5. The county agricultural
 commissioner shall continue to impose the fee for each subsequent application that may pose a risk of drift, until the person has completed 24 months without another Class A violation as defined in subdivision (a).

(c) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and may have a hearing within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days
 before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the county agricultural commissioner’s evidence and to present evidence on their own behalf. If a hearing is not timely requested, the county agricultural commissioner may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(d) If the person on whom the county agricultural commissioner levied a civil penalty requested and appeared at a hearing, the person may appeal the county agricultural commissioner’s decision to the director within 30 days of the date of receiving a copy of the county agricultural commissioner’s decision. The following procedures apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or their authorized agent, state the grounds for the
 appeal, and include a copy of the county agricultural commissioner’s decision. The appellant shall file a copy of the appeal with the county agricultural commissioner at the same time it is filed with the director.

(2) The appellant and the county agricultural commissioner may, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter or at a later time prescribed by the director, present the record of the hearing, including written evidence that was submitted at the hearing, and a written argument to the director stating grounds for affirming, modifying, or reversing the county agricultural commissioner’s decision.

(3) The director may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are filed.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the oral argument. The times may be altered by mutual agreement of the appellant, the county agricultural commissioner, and the director.

(5) The director shall decide the appeal on the record of the hearing, including the written evidence and the written argument described in paragraph (2), that the director has received. If the director finds substantial evidence in the record to support the county agricultural commissioner’s decision, the director shall affirm the decision.

(6) The director shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days of the date of
 oral arguments or as soon thereafter as practical.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the director may affirm the county agricultural commissioner’s decision, modify the county agricultural commissioner’s decision by reducing or increasing the amount of the penalty levied so that it is within the director’s guidelines for imposing civil penalties, or reverse the county agricultural commissioner’s decision. A civil penalty increased by the director shall not be higher than that proposed in the county agricultural commissioner’s notice of proposed action given pursuant to subdivision (c). A copy of the director’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant and the county agricultural commissioner.

(8) Any person who does not request a hearing pursuant to subdivision
 (c) may not file an appeal pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Review of a decision of the director may be sought by the appellant within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) The county agricultural commissioner may levy a civil penalty pursuant to subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) against a person violating paragraph (1), (2), or (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1695 of the Labor Code, that pertains to registration with the county agricultural commissioner, carrying proof of that registration, and filing changes of address with the county agricultural commissioner.

(f) After the exhaustion of the appeal and review procedures provided in this section, the county
 agricultural commissioner or their representative may file a certified copy of a final decision of the county agricultural commissioner that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, a copy of any decision of the
 director or their authorized representative rendered on an appeal from the county agricultural commissioner’s decision and a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. Fees shall not be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   (AB 1752)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12999.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Multijurisdictional priority investigation” means a priority investigation involving more than one county or a priority investigation involving a person that is the subject of priority investigations in more than one county.

(2) “Priority investigation” has the same meaning as in the 2005 Cooperative Agreement, or the most current version of the Cooperative Agreement, between the department, the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association, and the United States Environmental Protection Agency, Region 9.

(b) In lieu of a civil penalty levied by the county agricultural commissioner, the director may levy a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation described in subdivision (c), or may refer any of those violations to the proper enforcement agency, including the district attorney of the county where the violations occurred or the Attorney General.

(c) The director may initiate and maintain an enforcement action for a violation of a statute or implementing regulation described in Section 12999.5 meeting any of the following conditions:

(1) Where the county agricultural commissioner and director agree that enforcement by the department is appropriate.

(2) After consultation with the county agricultural commissioner for either of the following violations:

(A) A violation related to a multijurisdictional priority investigation involving human or environmental health effects.

(B) A violation that caused a health, property, or environmental hazard where the director finds the county agricultural commissioner has failed to discharge their duties pursuant to Section 2281.

(d) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and shall have the right to request a hearing within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not
 accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. Before the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the director’s evidence. At the hearing, the person shall be given the opportunity to present evidence on their own behalf. If a hearing is not timely requested, the director may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(e) If the person against whom the director levied a civil penalty requested and appeared at a hearing, the person may seek judicial review of the director’s decision within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) After exhaustion of the review procedures provided in this section, the director, or the director’s representative, may file a certified copy of a final
 decision of the director that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. Pursuant to Section 6103 of the Government Code, the clerk of the superior court shall not charge a fee for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(g) Any money recovered under this section shall be paid to the investigating county agricultural commissioner to reimburse the cost of the investigation with the remainder going into the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund for use by the department, upon appropriation, in administering this division and Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401).

(h) This
 section shall only apply to violations that occur on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 8.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13000.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), an action brought pursuant to this article shall be commenced by the director, the commissioner, the Attorney General, the district attorney, the city prosecutor, or the city attorney, as the case may be, within three years of the occurrence of the violation.

(b) When a commissioner submits a completed investigation to the director for action by the director or the Attorney General, the action shall be commenced within one year of that submission. However, this subdivision does not preclude the director from returning the investigation to the commissioner for action to be commenced by the
 commissioner, the district attorney, the city prosecutor, or the city attorney, as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) An action brought by the director to collect unpaid mill assessments and delinquent fees required by Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 12841) or an action brought by the director to collect civil penalties pursuant to Section 12999.4 for violations of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 12841), Section 12992, Section 12993, or Section 12995 shall be commenced within four years of the occurrence of the violation, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) An action brought by the director pursuant to Section 12999.4 or 12998 for violations of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 12841) or Section 12992, 12993, or 12995 that are discovered during
 the course of an audit performed pursuant to Section 12842 shall be commenced within two years from the date of audit completion and may be brought for a violation occurring
 within four years of the commencement of the audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 23.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13000.1.

The commissioner or director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any order made pursuant to this division in the superior court in the county in which the order is issued or the violation occurs or is threatened, and the court may enjoin the violation or threatened violation upon that showing and without further evidence of irreparable injury. The court may compel specific performance of any acts or course of conduct necessary to protect persons, animals, crops, or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 624, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

The director may, by regulation, adjust the level of statutory minimum and maximum civil monetary penalties provided under this article and in Section 11893 to account for inflation. The director shall make inflation adjustments consistent with the formula used by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to federal law for civil monetary penalties inflation adjustment for civil penalties provided under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 135 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 9.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Cease and Desist [13101. - 13102.]

13101.

The director, upon a finding that the use, handling, delivery, or sale of a pesticide in violation of any provision of this division, or any regulation issued pursuant to it, is taking place, or appears imminent, and that activity, if allowed to proceed, will present an immediate hazard or cause irreparable damage, may issue an order to the persons responsible for that activity to cease and desist from further commission of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

The agricultural commissioner, upon a finding that the use, handling, delivery, or sale of a pesticide in violation of any provision of this division, or any regulation issued pursuant to it, is taking place, or appears imminent, and that activity, if allowed to proceed, will present an immediate hazard or cause irreparable damage, may issue an order to the persons responsible for that activity to cease and desist from further commission of the violation.

Any person aggrieved by a cease and desist order issued by an agricultural commissioner may appeal the order to the director, who shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. The order of the agricultural commissioner shall remain in force during the appeal to the director, and until the director’s decision has been rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Birth Defect Prevention [13121. - 13135.]

13121.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Birth Defect Prevention Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13122.

It is the purpose of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to prevent pesticide induced abortions, birth defects, and infertility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13123.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms mean:

(a) “Adverse reproductive effect” means a statistically significant adverse effect on parental reproductive performance and the growth and development of offspring, including gonadal function, conception, and parturition; abortions; birth defects; stillbirths; and resorptions.

(b) “Data gap” means that the department does not have on file a full set of valid mandatory health effects studies.

(c) “Mandatory health effects study” means adverse reproductive effect, chronic toxicity, mutagenicity, neurotoxicity, oncogenicity, and teratogenicity studies required for full registration or licensing of pesticides in California, as of July 1, 1983.

(d) “Teratogenic” means the property of a substance or mixture of substances to produce or induce functional deviations or developmental anomalies, not heritable, in or on an animal embryo or fetus.

(e) “Mutagenic effect” means the property of a substance or mixture of substances to induce changes in the genetic complement of either somatic or germinal tissue in subsequent generations.

(f) “Chronic toxicity” means the property of a substance or mixture of substances to cause adverse effects in an organism upon repeated or continuous exposure over a period of at least one-half the lifetime of that organism.

(g) “Oncogenic” means the property of a substance or a mixture of substances to produce or induce benign or malignant tumor formations in living animals.

(h) “Neurotoxic effect” means any adverse effect on the nervous system such as delayed-onset locomotor ataxia resulting from single administration of the test substance, repeated once if necessary.

(i) “Initiation” means that the mandatory health effects study or any necessary preliminary studies, such as pilot studies or range finding studies, have been commenced.

(j) “Data generator” means a person who has completed and filed with the director a data commitment status report.

(k) “Completion” means that the study has been finished, the data has been analyzed, and the final report of the results, including all exhibits, has been prepared and submitted to the department.

(l) “Submitted” means deliverance of a completed study to the department. A study shall be deemed to be submitted until it has been determined by the department to be unacceptable and not capable of being upgraded.

(m) “Suspend” means the director has issued a notice of intent to suspend the registration of a pesticide product. The director shall issue a suspension order at the earliest possible time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 13.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

13123.5.

To the extent feasible, health effects studies shall be conducted in accordance with standards and protocols established pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 135 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13126.

No new active pesticide ingredient shall be conditionally registered or licensed when any of the mandatory health effects studies, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13123, is missing, incomplete, or of questionable validity unless the registration is based on previous consultation with the State Director of Health Services and the Director of Industrial Relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.

(a) Not later than December 31, 1985, the department shall identify 200 pesticide active ingredients which the department determines have the most significant data gaps and widespread use and which are suspected to be hazardous to people. Not later than 30 days after the report issued pursuant to former Section 13125, as added by Chapter 669 of the Statutes of 1984, the department shall notify each registrant of a pesticide product containing any of the identified 200 pesticide active ingredients of the applicable data gap required to be filled pursuant to this section.

(b) Not later than December 31, 1985, the department shall also adopt a timetable for the filling of all data gaps on all pesticide active ingredients, other than those identified by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), which are currently registered or licensed in California. The department shall notify registrants of the applicable data gaps and the scheduled time to initiate and complete studies as provided in the timetable.

(c) (1) Not later than September 1, 1986, the department shall determine whether a test has been initiated to fill each of the data gaps for each pesticide active ingredient identified in subdivision (a). If no test has been initiated, the department shall fill data gaps in accordance with procedures provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 136a of Title 7 of the United States Code. In order to carry out this section, the director has the same authority to require information from registrants of active pesticide ingredients and to suspend registration that the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency has pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 136a of Title 7 of the United States Code. If a hearing is requested regarding the proposed suspension of registration, it shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. On or before July 1, 1986, the director shall, by regulation, prescribe procedures for resolving disputes or funding the filling of data gaps. The procedures may include mediation and arbitration. The arbitration procedures, insofar as practical, shall be consistent with the federal act, or otherwise shall be in accordance with the commercial arbitration rules established by the American Arbitration Association. The procedures shall be established so as to resolve any dispute within the timetable established in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall also obtain the data which is identified in subdivision (b), according to the timetable and procedures specified in this section.

(d) The director shall review the timetable established by the Environmental Protection Agency for the accelerated registration program under amendments effective in 1989 to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(e) (1) This section does not apply to any product which the director determines has limited use or that substantial economic hardship would result to users due to unavailability of the product and there is not significant exposure to the public or workers and the product is otherwise in compliance with federal law.

(2) The director may not, pursuant to this subdivision, exempt all pesticide products containing the same pesticide active ingredient unless it is determined that the pesticide active ingredient has only limited use, there is insignificant exposure to workers or the public, and the products are otherwise in compliance with federal law. Any exemption issued pursuant to this paragraph shall expire at the end of three years after it is issued.

(f) (1) Whenever the director exercises the authority provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), he or she shall give public notice of the action stating the reasons for exempting the pesticide product from the data requirements of this article. Copies of this notice shall be provided to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(2) Whenever the director acts pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the director shall furnish not less than 30 days’ public notice of the proposed action, stating the reasons for exempting the pesticide product from the data requirements of this article and allowing public comment thereon. Copies of the notice and the final decision shall be provided to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.2.

The director shall, on January 15, 1992, issue a notice of the impending suspension of the registration of any pesticide product containing an active ingredient identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127 for which the registrant has not submitted the required data by December 31, 1991. The data generator or registrant may petition the director within 30 days of notification of impending suspension of registration for deferral of the suspension pursuant to Section 13127.3. The director shall act upon such a petition at the earliest possible time and, upon denial of the petition, suspend the registration of each such product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 14.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.3.

(a) The director shall grant an extension of time for submission of the required data if, and only if, the director, with the concurrence of the Secretary for Environmental Protection, makes a finding that both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The registrant has submitted at least eight of the mandatory health effects studies, and has initiated the studies required to fill the remaining data gaps by January 15, 1992, unless the registrant can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director that it failed to have eight studies submitted, and the remaining studies initiated, in accordance with this paragraph because not more than two studies were delayed due to specific, written direction of the department based upon a written evaluation by a department toxicologist.

(2) That the registrant has taken appropriate steps to meet the requirements of this article. To determine whether appropriate steps have been taken, the director shall consider the registrant’s timely response to data call-ins on other active ingredients contained in products registered with the department pursuant to this article and pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 13141), and whether the registrant has responded in a timely and appropriate manner to notices and correspondence from the department relating to data call-ins and has taken appropriate measures to address study deficiencies identified by the department.

(b) A registrant shall not be considered to have taken the appropriate steps, as provided in subdivision (a), if the registrant has failed to meet the deadlines established by this article due to efforts to coordinate compliance with federal data requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 15.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.31.
